Montana, session 2025, SB432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 60-4-401, MCA, is amended to read:
"60-4-401. Occupancy and relocation -- definitions. For the purposes of this part, unless otherwise
indicated, the following definitions apply:
(1) (a) "Cost of relocation" means the amount paid by the utility for material, labor, and equipment
properly attributable to the relocation after deducting any increase in the value of the new facility and any
salvage value derived from the old facility.
(b) "Cost of relocation" does not mean engineering costs for designing, locating, staking,
inspecting, or any other incidental costs of engineering.
(2) "Facility" means a utility's tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other
equipment and appliances impacted by a project on a commission-designated highway system or state
highway.
(3) "Utility" includes publicly, privately, and cooperatively owned utilities, including water and sewer
facilities, as well as providers of cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522 and providers of broadband service
as defined in 90-1-602."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 432